Rhode Island, session 2025, SB143.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-56 of the General Laws entitled "Corrections Department" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-56-43. Medication for opioid use disorder.
(a) For purposes of this section, “medication for opioid use disorder” means treatment of
the medical diagnosis, "opioid use disorder" with medications requiring a prescription or order from
an authorized prescribing professional.
(b) The department shall establish a program to be administered at the adult correctional
institutions for the purpose of employing medication assisted treatment for any persons imprisoned
who are undergoing treatment for an opioid use disorder. The program shall include all forms of
medication for opioid use disorder approved for the treatment of an opioid use disorder by the
federal Food and Drug Administration, and shall apply for the duration of the person’s incarceration
and provide an individualized treatment plan for each participant.
(c) Within twenty-four (24) hours after admission, each inmate shall be screened for an
opioid use disorder as part of an ongoing opioid use screening and assessment process.
(d) After a medical screening, persons who are determined to suffer from an opioid use
disorder for which FDA-approved addiction medications exist shall be offered placement in the
medication for opioid use disorder program. Placement in the program shall be voluntary. Each
participant shall work with an authorized specialist to determine an individualized treatment plan,
including an appropriate level of counseling. Decisions regarding type, dosage, or duration of any

medication regimen shall be made by a qualified and licensed health care professional who is
authorized to administer the medication.
(e) An eligible inmate may enter into the program at any time during the inmate's
incarceration. An inmate who is taking medication for an opioid use disorder pursuant to a valid
prescription shall be entitled to continue using and receiving that medication pending a medical
evaluation.
(f) No person shall be denied participation in the program on the basis of a positive drug
screening upon entering custody or upon intake into the program; nor shall any person receive a
disciplinary infraction for a positive drug screening upon entering custody, or upon intake into the
program. No person shall be removed from, or denied participation in, the program on the basis of
having received any disciplinary infraction either before entry into, or during participation in, the
program.
(g) The program shall include a re-entry strategy for individuals who have participated in
medication for opioid use disorder. The strategy shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Providing each participant with information on available treatment facilities in their
area, information on available housing and employment resources, and any other information that
will assist the individual in continued recovery once released;
(2) Sharing with parole officers accurate information regarding the inmate’s participation
in medication for opioid use disorder to ensure that their medication is not deemed illicit or illegal.
(h) If a licensed practitioner makes a clinical judgment to discontinue a medication for
opioid use disorder the inmate had been using prior to incarceration, the practitioner shall cause the
reason for the discontinuance to be entered into the inmate’s medical record, specifically stating
the reason for the discontinuance. The inmate shall be provided, both orally and in writing, with a
specific explanation of the decision to discontinue the medication and with notice of the right to
have the inmate's community-based prescriber notified of the decision. If the inmate provides
signed authorization, the department shall notify the community-based prescriber in writing of the
decision to discontinue the medication.
(i) The department shall submit, within one year of the effective date of this section and
annually thereafter, a report to the governor and the general assembly on the effectiveness of the
program established pursuant to this section. The reports shall include an analysis of the impact of
the program on the participants, including factors to include disciplinary incidents, reentry rates,
and other related relevant factors. The reports shall also include the impact on institutional safety
and performance and any recommendations for additional legislative enactments that may be
needed or required to improve or enhance the program as determined to be appropriate by the
LC000173 - Page 2 of 4

department.
(j) Nothing in this section shall be construed to dictate the provider-patient relationship or
preempt existing state or federal laws, regulations or guidelines governing opioid treatment
program administration in general, such as in the community, including the requirement of
implementation of a diversion control plan, or dictate the standard of care for opioid treatment
program administration or patient care, which is expected to generally follow the community
standard of care, or reframe drug availability and formulary considerations as dictated by state and
federal laws, regulations or guidelines.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC000173
========
LC000173 - Page 3 of 4